Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2002
Terms, defined.

As used in the Office of Public Counsel Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Administrative agency shall mean any department, board, commission, or other governmental unit, any official, any employee of the State of Nebraska acting or purporting to act by reason of connection with the State of Nebraska, any corporation, partnership, business, firm, governmental entity, or person who is providing health and human services to individuals or service delivery, service coordination, or case management under contract with the State of Nebraska and who is subject to the jurisdiction of the office of Public Counsel as required by section 73-401, any regional behavioral health authority, any community-based behavioral health services provider that contracts with a regional behavioral health authority, and any county or municipal correctional or jail facility and employee thereof acting or purporting to act by reason of connection with the county or municipal correctional or jail facility; but shall not include (a) any court, (b) any member or employee of the Legislature or the Legislative Council, (c) the Governor or his or her personal staff, (d) any political subdivision or entity thereof except a county or municipal correctional or jail facility or a regional behavioral health authority, (e) any instrumentality formed pursuant to an interstate compact and answerable to more than one state, or (f) any entity of the federal government; and

(2) Administrative act shall include every action, rule, regulation, order, omission, decision, recommendation, practice, or procedure of an administrative agency.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 1, p. 2879;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 121;

Laws 2008, LB467, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB821, § 41;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,240;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 2.